Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2987
Voluntary dissolution by the board and members.

In order to voluntarily dissolve:

(1) A resolution to dissolve shall be approved by a majority vote of the board of directors unless a greater vote is required by the articles of organization or bylaws;

(2) The board of directors shall mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

(a) The resolution required by subdivision (1) of this section;

(b) A recommendation that the members vote in favor of the resolution, unless the board determines because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation;

(c) If the board makes no recommendation, the basis of that decision; and

(d) A notice of the meeting in the same manner as a special members' meeting;

(3) Subject to section 21-2939, the resolution to dissolve shall be approved by at least a two-thirds vote of patron members voting at the meeting and at least two-thirds vote of investor members voting at the meeting; and

(4) Unless otherwise provided in the resolution, the limited cooperative association is dissolved upon approval under subdivision (3) of this section.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 87.